Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1129
Dentist; use of own name required; exception.

No person shall operate any place in which dentistry is practiced under any other name than his or her own or display in connection with his or her practice or on any advertising matter any other than his or her own name. Two or more licensed dentists who are associated in the practice may use all of their names. A widow, widower, or heir of a deceased dentist may operate such office under the name of the deceased dentist for a period of not longer than one year from the date of death.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 90, p. 479;

C.S.1929, § 71-1209;

R.S.1943, § 71-191;

Laws 1957, c. 292, § 3, p. 1050;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-191;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 462.